Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2520YH (1) 91 dg/jh H.F. 278 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554I.1 Short title. 1 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the âSocial 2 Media Parental Authorization Actâ . 3 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554I.2 Definitions. 4 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 5 requires: 6 1. âMinorâ means an individual under the age of eighteen who 7 currently resides in Iowa. 8 2. âParental authorizationâ means all of the following: 9 a. A written statement signed by both a minor and the 10 minorâs parent or legal guardian that authorizes the minor to 11 create an account on a social media platform. 12 b. A digital authorization by a parent or a legal guardian 13 of a minor that authorizes the minor to create an account 14 on a social media platform if the social media platform 15 has previously verified that the account granting parental 16 authorization belongs to the parent or legal guardian of the 17 minor seeking parental authorization. 18 3. âSocial media companyâ means a company that operates a 19 social media platform. 20 4. a. âSocial media platformâ means an internet site or 21 application that is open to the public and that allows a user 22 to create an account for the primary purpose of performing all 23 of the following: 24 (1) Create personal profiles or accounts that include the 25 personâs name, age, location, and other personal information. 26 (2) Connect with other social media platform users as 27 friends, followers, or any other means of connecting that 28 allows other users to access shared content. 29 (3) Facilitate public access to content, including text, 30 images, videos, internet site links, or any other information. 31 (4) Send private messages to other social media platform 32 users. 33 (5) Create groups for the purpose of communicating about 34 shared interests. 35 -1- LSB 2520YH (1) 91 dg/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 278 b. âSocial media platformâ does not include an online 1 service, website, or application where the predominate or 2 exclusive function is interactive gaming, virtual gaming, or 3 an online service that allows the creation and uploading of 4 content for the purpose of interactive gaming, educational 5 entertainment, or associated entertainment, and the 6 communication related to such content. 7 5. âUserâ means an individual who uses a social media 8 platform. 9 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554I.3 Parental authorization 10 requirements. 11 1. A social media company shall not permit a minor to be 12 an account holder on the social media companyâs social media 13 platform unless the social media company has received prior 14 express parental authorization. 15 2. A social media company shall allow a parent or guardian 16 who has provided parental authorization to revoke or rescind 17 the grant of parental authorization upon request at any time. 18 3. A social media company shall not collect, transfer, 19 transmit, image, or retain any data from or regarding a minor 20 if the minor has not received parental authorization for the 21 minor to be an account holder on the social media companyâs 22 social media platform in accordance with subsection 1. 23 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a 24 social media company shall not permit a minor to create, use, 25 or hold an account on the social media companyâs social media 26 platform if the minor is prohibited from creating, using, or 27 holding an account on a social media platform under any other 28 provision of state or federal law. 29 5. A social media company shall provide a parent or guardian 30 who has granted parental authorization under subsection 1 with 31 a password or other means to access the account of the minor, 32 which shall allow the parent or guardian to do all of the 33 following: 34 a. View all posts created by the minor on the social media 35 -2- LSB 2520YH (1) 91 dg/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 278 platform. 1 b. View all messages sent by, and responses received by, the 2 minor on the social media platform. 3 c. Control the privacy and account settings of the minorâs 4 account on the social media platform. 5 d. Monitor and limit the amount of time the minor may spend 6 using the social media platform. 7 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554I.4 Enforcement ââ penalties. 8 If the attorney general has reasonable belief that a social 9 media company is in violation of this chapter, the attorney 10 general may bring a civil action to provide for civil penalties 11 in an amount not more than one thousand dollars for each 12 violation of this chapter. 13 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 554I.5 Private right of action. 14 A person harmed by a violation of this chapter by a social 15 media company may bring a civil action in the district court 16 in which the person resides and, upon a finding that a social 17 media company violated this chapter, a district court may order 18 any of the following: 19 1. Damages in an amount equal to the greater of either ten 20 thousand dollars for each violation or, if the court determines 21 that the social media companyâs violation was the direct cause 22 of the harm, the amount of actual damages for any financial, 23 physical, and emotional harm to the person bringing the action. 24 2. Punitive damages. 25 3. Reasonable attorney fees and court costs. 26 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 554I.6 Rules. 27 The attorney general shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 28 17A to administer this chapter, including but not limited to 29 rules to establish all of the following: 30 1. Processes or means by which a social media company can 31 comply with the parental authorization requirements under 32 section 554I.3. 33 2. Acceptable forms or methods of parental authorization. 34 3. Processes to confirm that a social media company has 35 -3- LSB 2520YH (1) 91 dg/jh 3/ 5 H.F. 278 received parental authorization under section 554I.3 for each 1 minor that has created an account on the social media companyâs 2 social media platform. 3 Sec. 7. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to a social media 4 company operating on or after the effective date of this Act. 5